Maine, session 132, LD312.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2074, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
C. Twenty-five miles per hour in a business or residential district or built-up portion
unless otherwise posted; and
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2074, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2005, c. 577, §30, is
further amended to read:
D. Forty-five miles per hour on all other public ways unless otherwise posted; and.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §2074, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2009, c. 9, §1, is
repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR0765(03)